Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.360

Director's duty—Process to challenge information—Nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

The director shall establish a process whereby mortgage loan originators may challenge information entered into the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry by the director.

[ 2009 c 528 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—License requirement—Implementation—2009 c 528: See notes following RCW 19.146.010.